Washington statutes.
RCW 36.18.010

Auditor's fees.

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1498-S.SL) ***

Except as otherwise ordered by the court pursuant to RCW 4.24.130, county auditors or recording officers shall collect the following fees for their official services:

(1) For recording instruments, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $5; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1. The fee for recording multiple transactions contained in one instrument will be calculated for each transaction requiring separate indexing as required under RCW 65.04.050 as follows: The fee for each title or transaction is the same fee as the first page of any additional recorded document; the fee for additional pages is the same fee as for any additional pages for any recorded document; the fee for the additional pages may be collected only once and may not be collected for each title or transaction;

(2) For preparing and certifying copies, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $3; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;

(3) For preparing noncertified copies, for each page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;

(4) For administering an oath or taking an affidavit, with or without seal, $2;

(5) For issuing a marriage license, $8, (this fee includes taking necessary affidavits, filing returns, indexing, and transmittal of a record of the marriage to the state registrar of vital statistics) plus an additional $5 fee for use and support of the prevention of child abuse and neglect activities to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund plus an additional $10 fee to be transmitted monthly to the state treasurer and deposited in the state general fund. The legislature intends to appropriate an amount at least equal to the revenue generated by this fee for the purposes of the displaced homemaker act, *chapter 28B.04 RCW;

(6) For searching records per hour, $8;

(7) For recording plats, 50 cents for each lot except cemetery plats for which the charge shall be 25 cents per lot; also $1 for each acknowledgment, dedication, and description: PROVIDED, That there shall be a minimum fee of $25 per plat;

(8) For recording of miscellaneous records not listed above, for the first page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $5; for each additional page eight and one-half by 14 inches or less, $1;

(9) For modernization and improvement of the recording and indexing system, a surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.170;

(10) For recording an emergency nonstandard document as provided in RCW 65.04.047, $50, in addition to all other applicable recording fees;

(11) For recording instruments, a $3 surcharge to be deposited into the Washington state library operations account created in RCW 43.07.129;

(12) For recording instruments, a $2 surcharge to be deposited into the Washington state library-archives building account created in RCW 43.07.410 until the financing contract entered into by the secretary of state for the Washington state library-archives building is paid in full;

(13) For recording instruments, the surcharge as provided in RCW 36.22.250; and

(14) For recording instruments, except for documents exempt under RCW 36.22.185(2), an assessment as provided in RCW 36.22.185.

[ 2023 c 340 s 8; 2023 c 277 s 9; 2022 c 141 s 2; 2019 c 448 s 3; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 28 s 1; 2007 c 523 s 2. Prior: 2005 c 484 s 19; 2005 c 374 s 1; 2002 c 294 s 3; 1999 c 233 s 3; 1996 c 143 s 1; 1995 c 246 s 37; 1991 c 26 s 2; prior: 1989 c 304 s 1; 1989 c 204 s 6; 1987 c 230 s 1; 1985 c 44 s 2; 1984 c 261 s 4; 1982 1st ex.s. c 15 s 7; 1982 c 4 s 12; 1977 ex.s. c 56 s 1; 1967 c 26 s 8; 1963 c 4 s 36.18.010; prior: 1959 c 263 s 6; 1953 c 214 s 2; 1951 c 51 s 4; 1907 c 56 s 1, part, p 92; 1903 c 151 s 1, part, p 295; 1893 c 130 s 1, part, p 423; Code 1881 s 2086, part, p 358; 1869 p 369 s 3; 1865 p 94 s 1; part; 1863 p 391 s 1, part, p 394; 1861 p 34 s 1, part, p 37; 1854 p 368 s 1, part, p 371; RRS ss 497, part, 4105.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: *(1) Chapter 28B.04 RCW expired August 1, 2015, pursuant to 2015 c 55 s 101.

(2) This section was amended by 2023 c 277 s 9 and by 2023 c 340 s 8, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Short title—Conflict with federal requirements—2023 c 340: See notes following RCW 43.181.040.

Effective date—2022 c 141: See note following RCW 4.24.130.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 448: See note following RCW 43.07.405.

Effective date—2007 c 523 s 2: "Section 2 of this act takes effect January 1, 2008." [ 2007 c 523 s 8.]

Contingency—2007 c 523: See note following RCW 43.07.128.

Findings—Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2005 c 484: See RCW 43.185C.005, 43.185C.901, and 43.185C.902.

Findings—2002 c 294: "The legislature recognizes housing affordability has become a significant problem for a large portion of society in many parts of Washington state in recent years. The state has traditionally focused its resources on housing for low-income populations. Additional funding resources are needed for building operation and maintenance activities for housing projects affordable to extremely low-income people, for example farmworkers or people with developmental disabilities. Affordable rents for extremely low-income people are not sufficient to cover the cost of building operations and maintenance. In addition resources are needed at the local level to assist in development and preservation of affordable low-income housing to address critical local housing needs." [ 2002 c 294 s 1.]

Effective date—1999 c 233: See note following RCW 4.28.320.

Effective date—1996 c 143: "This act shall take effect January 1, 1997." [ 1996 c 143 s 5.]

Effective date—1995 c 246 s 37: "Section 37 of this act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately [May 5, 1995]." [ 1995 c 246 s 39.]

Findings—1989 c 204: See note following RCW 36.22.160.

Effective date—1987 c 230: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1987." [ 1987 c 230 s 4.]

Effective date—1967 c 26: See note following RCW 43.70.150.

Family court funding, marriage license fee increase authorized: RCW 26.12.220.